Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Market Services

260.015.
Logo or labeling statement program — Licensing — Penalty. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

260.016.
Definitions for KRS 260.016 to 260.019.

As used in KRS

260.016

to

260.019

:

“Agricultural product” means any farm product grown, raised, or produced as a result of being in the business of “agriculture,” as defined by KRS

246.010

; and

“Kentucky-grown agricultural product” means any agricultural product grown, raised, produced, processed, or manufactured in Kentucky; and any product processed or manufactured from one (1) of the following fish species, provided the fish were harvested from a river, lake, or other body of water located in Kentucky: Asian carp, paddlefish, or sturgeon.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 154, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2021 ch. 101, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

260.017.
Kentucky Proud™ Program — Logo or statement labeling — Licensing — Penalty.

The Commissioner shall establish a Kentucky Proud™ Program to promote the sale of agricultural products and, if funds are available, shall develop a logo or labeling statement for use in identifying Kentucky-grown agricultural products that qualify for the program. The Commissioner may develop labeling statements that apply to specific marketing or promotional needs.

The logo or labeling statement shall not be used without a license from the Commissioner, except that wholesalers and retailers may use the logo or labeling statement for displaying and advertising products that qualify for the Kentucky Proud™ Program. The Commissioner may deny the use of the logo or labeling statements if they are used in a manner that does not meet the criteria of the program.

The logo or labeling statement shall not supersede or replace any federal or state label or grade statement that is required by law.

A person shall not use the logo or labeling statement without an annual license from the Commissioner.

In order to accomplish the purposes of this section, the Commissioner may participate jointly with persons in appropriate logo programs and projects and may enter into contracts necessary to carry out those programs and projects.

If funds are available, the Department of Agriculture may provide grants-in-aid and other assistance to those persons who wish to participate in the Kentucky Proud™ Program.

The Commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

260.016

to

260.019

, and may establish a fee schedule for persons who process, manufacture, or distribute eligible agricultural products in Kentucky. Those persons may be required to pay a fee into the fund created by KRS

260.019

in order to participate in the Kentucky Proud™ Program.

It shall be the duty of the department, or upon the request of the Commissioner of Agriculture, of the Attorney General, to bring an action for the recovery of the penalties provided in this section, and to bring an action for an injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate any of the provisions of KRS

260.016

to

260.019

or the administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS

260.016

to

260.019

.

A person who is required to have a license to participate in the Kentucky Proud™ Program and uses the logo or labeling statement without a license after being notified by the Commissioner that a license is required shall be liable to a civil penalty not to exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for the violation, and an additional civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which the violation continues. The penalties shall be recoverable in an action brought in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by the department or, upon the department’s request, by the Attorney General.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 154, § 4, effective July 15, 2008.

260.018.
Kentucky Proud™ Advisory Council.

The Kentucky Proud Advisory Council is hereby created for the purpose of advising the department concerning the implementation and administration of the Kentucky Proud™ Program authorized by KRS

260.017

. The council shall consist of the following twelve (12) members:

Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s designee, who shall serve as chair and who shall appoint the members in subparagraphs 3. to 11. of this paragraph;

Dean, University of Kentucky College of Agriculture, or the dean’s representative;

One (1) farmer member of the Kentucky Proud Program;

One (1) Kentucky food retailer;

One (1) Kentucky food distributor;

One (1) Kentucky food processor;

One (1) Kentucky agritourism venue operator;

One (1) representative of a Kentucky agriculture commodity organization;

One (1) Kentucky restaurateur;

One (1) producer of a Kentucky Proud product; and

Two (2) at-large members.

Each appointed member of the council shall serve for a term of two (2) years or until a successor is appointed and may be reappointed for additional terms.

The chair or a majority of the members may call a meeting to order, and the council may meet as often as necessary for the conduct of its business. A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The council shall:

Advise the department concerning the implementation and administration of the Kentucky Proud™ Program; and

Make recommendations to the department regarding the content of administrative regulations promulgated by the department in accordance with KRS

260.016

to

260.019

Appointed council members may be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in carrying out the official duties of the council.

The council shall be attached to the Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 154, § 5, effective July 15, 2008.

260.019.
Kentucky Proud™ promotion fund.

The Kentucky Proud™ promotion fund is created in the State Treasury as a trust and agency account to be administered by the department for the purposes provided in this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

45.229

, any moneys accruing to this fund in any fiscal year, including state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, interest, and any other funds both public and private, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Moneys received in the fund shall be used for administrative expenses to support the Kentucky Proud™ Program, provide grants-in-aid, and other purposes and expenses related to promoting Kentucky-grown agricultural products.

No producer or processor of wild caught Asian carp, paddlefish, or sturgeon shall be eligible for moneys from the Kentucky Proud™ promotion fund or the rural development fund as provided under KRS

248.655

. An aquaculture producer who raises paddlefish or sturgeon in Kentucky under controlled or semi-controlled conditions shall be eligible for such funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 154, § 6, effective July 15, 2008; 2021 ch. 101, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

260.020.
Office of Agricultural Marketing — Executive director — Administrative Regulations.

The Office of Agricultural Marketing in the Department of Agriculture shall be under the supervision of the Commissioner, and shall consist of personnel determined and appointed by the Commissioner.

The Office of Agricultural Marketing shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of any programs established under the Office of Agricultural Marketing, and may establish fees for the administration of those programs.

HISTORY:

42a-3: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 138; 1966, ch. 255, § 223; 1990, ch. 393, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 121, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 358, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 209, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2018 ch. 3, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

260.030.
Functions of Office of Agricultural Marketing.

The Office of Agricultural Marketing shall:

Promote and develop markets for Kentucky agricultural products, assist in setting up farm cooperatives, and assist in coordinating feasibility studies, loans, grants, and funding activities for producers and cooperatives;

Gather and disseminate information concerning supply, demand, prevailing prices, and commercial movement, including common and cold storage of food products, and maintain market news service for the purpose of disseminating this information;

Foster and encourage the inspection, grading, standardizing, labeling, and branding of farm products; provide standards of excellence and brands for the use of producers and consumers in the marketing of Kentucky-grown products; and promote the standardization of packages and containers for those purposes;

Promulgate administrative regulations for the grading, packing, hauling, storing, and sale of farm products if the administrative regulations are authorized by statutes, and enforce those administrative regulations;

Act as mediator or arbitrator, when invited, in any issue that may arise between producers and distributors of agricultural products;

Encourage the establishment of public markets and direct dealing between producer and consumer;

Promote the sale of Kentucky-grown products locally, and in domestic and international markets;

Encourage the development of a market for the commercial production of earthworms;

Negotiate and enter into cooperative agreements with the United States Department of Agriculture or any other appropriate federal agency for carrying out the provisions of this section;

Develop opportunities for the diversification of Kentucky agriculture, including additional crops and enterprises for tobacco growers; and

Establish an Organic Agricultural Product Certification Program.

The functions of the office shall be supplementary to, and not in duplication of, the educational activities of the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky.

In accomplishing its purposes, the office shall not compete with business operated by private capital.

HISTORY:

42a-4: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 137; 1980, ch. 362, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 393, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 121, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 358, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 209, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2018 ch. 3, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, adoption date and effective date, KRS

13A.330

.

260.031.
Kentucky Farmers Market Nutrition Program — Fund.

The Kentucky Farmers Market Nutrition Program is created within the Kentucky Department of Agriculture, in collaboration with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, for the purpose of enhancing nutrition. The program’s services may include the provision of fresh, locally grown produce to low-income citizens, including but not limited to seniors and recipients of the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children provided by the federal Food and Nutrition Service.

The department may collaborate with the United States Department of Agriculture, the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture Cooperative Extension Service, local Area Agencies on Aging, community agencies, foundations, philanthropic organizations, farmers, and local fiscal courts to:

Identify funding sources;

Establish services and a program delivery strategy;

Market the program to citizens and farmers; and

Develop strategies to introduce fresh, locally grown fruits and vegetables into school food programs.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations to establish eligibility criteria and implement the program established in subsection (1) of this section.

The department may accept gifts, grants, federal or state funds, or any other public or private funds to develop or implement the program.

The Kentucky Farmers Market Nutrition Program fund is created in the State Treasury as a trust and agency account. Moneys deposited in the fund shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the Commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Agriculture. This fund shall be used solely for the purpose of providing nutritious food to low-income citizens. The fund shall not lapse, and funds not expended during any fiscal year shall carry forward to the next fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 116, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). A manifest clerical or typographical error in this section has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

260.032.
Annual report on the Kentucky Farmers Market Nutrition Program.

The Commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Agriculture shall submit an annual report to the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare and the Interim Joint Committee on Agriculture, which includes but is not limited to:

The amount of funding received for the Kentucky Farmers Market Nutrition Program;

The economic impact of the program;

Strategies implemented to market the program and improve nutrition; and

Statistics related to the number of individuals served and farmers’ markets participating in the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 116, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 135, § 7, effective July 15, 2010.

260.033.
Hay grading program.

The Department of Agriculture shall promote the sale of hay produced in the state by administering a standard grading program for evaluating hay quality.

The department shall, after consultation with the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture and associations actively involved in promoting the sale of hay within the state, promulgate administrative regulations establishing quality standards and procedures for grading hay, and shall promote the sale of hay produced by participants in the department’s standard grading program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 160, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 318, § 184, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

260.035.
Identification of opportunities in procurement process to encourage agricultural economy — Report.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall identify opportunities in the state procurement process for the Commonwealth to use its purchasing power to support and encourage the growth of Kentucky’s agricultural economy. Those opportunities shall include the sale of Kentucky-grown agricultural products, as defined in KRS

45A.630

, to any public purchasing unit, as defined in KRS 45A.295(3), including but not limited to the Department of Parks, the Department of Corrections, public universities, school districts, and local governments across the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall report those opportunities to the Governor, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the Legislative Research Commission by October 1, 2002. The report shall also include recommended changes in the procurement system that may accommodate the sale of more Kentucky-grown agricultural products to state agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 344, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

260.036.
Agricultural products grading program.

The Department of Agriculture may promote the sale of raw agricultural products produced in the state by operating, maintaining, and administering a standard grading program for evaluating raw agricultural products.

The department may, after consultation with the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture and associations actively involved in promoting the sale of agricultural products within the state, promulgate standards for grading, marking, weighing, storing, transporting, and harvesting these agricultural products. These standards shall promote the sale of agricultural products by standardizing the quality and quantity of the raw agricultural products produced by participants in the department’s standard grading program.

The department may undertake appropriate measures to aid, encourage, foster, and promote the sale, development, and improvement of raw agricultural products produced in the state which have been graded by a department standard grading program.

The department may employ persons to carry out the provisions of this section.

The department may administer the provisions of this section and adopt administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of this section. The department may conduct examinations, inspections, or hearings for the proper administration of this standard grading program. All authorized hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The department may collect a reasonable fee for grading services provided to a participant in the standard grading program. However, the fee shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per sample graded by the department’s employees. All fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be credited to the department for use in carrying out the standard grading program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 160, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 318, § 185, effective July 15, 1996.

260.037.
Certificate of free sale — Fee — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section, “certificate of free sale” means a document attesting that a product is legally sold or distributed in the open, without restriction, in the country of origin.

The Department of Agriculture is authorized to issue certificates of free sale for products that are manufactured or processed in Kentucky and not intended for human consumption.

The department shall charge a reasonable fee for issuing certificates of free sale.

The department may adopt rules and promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 48, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

260.038.
Organic certification fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a separate trust and agency account to be known as the “organic certification fund” to be administered by the Department of Agriculture for the purposes provided in this section. Any moneys accruing to this fund in any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any moneys deposited in the fund shall be used to provide for a portion of the operating costs of the Organic Agricultural Product Certification Program required under KRS

260.030

;

Any moneys received from the collection of certification fees from the Organic Agricultural Product Certification Program shall be deposited in the fund; and

The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.